Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8063.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 11-37-3 and 11-37-8.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-37 entitled
"Sexual Assault" are hereby amended to read as follows:
11-37-3. Penalty for first degree sexual assault.
Every person who shall commit sexual assault in the first degree shall be imprisoned for a
period not less than ten (10) years and may be imprisoned for life; provided, however, that the
sentencing court shall ensure that the victim or victims approve of any negotiated sentence imposed
on the offender.
11-37-8.2. Penalty for first degree child molestation sexual assault.
Every person who shall commit first degree child molestation sexual assault shall be
imprisoned for a period of not less than twenty-five (25) years and may be imprisoned for life;
provided, however, that the sentencing court shall ensure that the victim or victims, or their parents
or guardian, approve of the any negotiated sentence imposed on the offender.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005198
========